North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 24. Trust Companies and Interstate Trust Business.

Part 1. Definitions.

§ 53-301.
Definitions.

Except as otherwise provided in this Article, or when the context clearly indicates that a different meaning is intended, the following definitions shall apply throughout this Article:

“Account” means the client relationship established with a trust institution involving the transfer of real or personal property to the trust institution or the assumption of duties by the trust institution concerning real or personal property.

“Act as a fiduciary” means:

To (i) act as trustee under a written instrument or by judicial appointment or order; (ii) receive money or other property as trustee for investment or reinvestment in real or personal property; (iii) act as custodian or custodial trustee under a gifts to minors act, a transfers to minors act, a custodial trust act, or similar statute; (iv) act as personal representative of the estate of a deceased person; (v) act as trustee, guardian, or conservator for the person or estate of an incompetent such as a minor or incapacitated person, or in other circumstances in which a guardian may be appointed; or (vi) act in a capacity similar to one listed in (i) through (v), however such capacity may be designated under applicable law or governing instrument; or

To possess, purchase, sell, safekeep, or otherwise manage or administer property in any other fiduciary capacity.

“Affiliate” means a company that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another company.

(3a)

“Affiliate transfer” means a transfer of an account pursuant to Part 7 of this Article by one trust institution affiliate of that trust institution.

“Authorized trust institution” means any State trust company and any trust office or representative trust office of a trust institution located in this State that is not a bank.

“Bank” has the meaning set forth in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(a)(1), except that “bank” does not include a trust company.

“Bank supervisory agency” means:

Any agency of another state or a home country with primary responsibility for chartering or supervising a trust institution; and

The Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, a Federal Reserve Bank acting in a supervisory capacity over any bank or bank holding company, the Office of Thrift Supervision, and any successor to these agencies.

(6a)

“Board of directors” means the governing body of a company.

“Branch” has the meaning set forth in G.S. 53C-1-4(11).

“Charter” means a charter issued to a State trust company by the Commissioner or a charter, license, or other authority issued by the Commissioner or a bank supervisory agency authorizing a trust institution to act as a fiduciary in its home state or home country, and the issuance of the charter, license, or other authority.

“Client” means a person to whom a trust institution owes a duty or obligation under an account.

“Commission” means the North Carolina State Banking Commission.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Banks for the State of North Carolina.

“Company” includes a bank, trust company, corporation, partnership, association, limited liability company, trust, business trust, joint venture, foundation, pool, syndicate, unincorporated organization, or other form of entity not specifically listed herein.

“Control,” with respect to a State trust company, means:

The ownership of or ability or power to vote directly, acting through one or more other persons, or otherwise indirectly, ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding shares of a class of voting securities of the State trust company;

The ability to control, directly or indirectly, the election of a majority of the board of the State trust company; or

The power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a controlling influence over the management or policies of the State trust company.

“Debt security” means a marketable obligation evidencing indebtedness of a company in the form of a bond, note, debenture, or other debt instrument.

“Depository institution” means any company within any of the definitions of “insured depository institution” set forth in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(c).

(15a)

“Director” means a member of the board of directors.

“Equity capital” means the amount by which the total assets of a State trust company exceed its total liabilities.

“Equity security” means:

Stock, other than adjustable rate preferred stock and money market (auction rate) preferred stock;

A certificate of interest or participation in a profit-sharing agreement, collateral-trust certificate, preorganization certificate or subscription, transferable share, investment contract, or voting-trust certificate;

A security immediately convertible at the option of the holder without payment of significant additional consideration into a security described by this subdivision;

A security carrying a warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase a security described by this subdivision; and

A certificate of interest or participation in, temporary or interim certificate for, or receipt for a security described by this subdivision that evidences an existing or contingent equity ownership interest.

“Executive officer” means an officer of a company who is named an executive officer by the company or who participates in major policy-making functions of the company.

“Federally chartered savings association” means a company described in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(b)(2).

“Fiduciary record” means a matter written, transcribed, recorded, received, or otherwise in the possession or control of a trust institution, whether in physical, electronic, magnetic, or other form, that preserves information concerning an account or a client.

“Foreign bank” means a foreign bank, as defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(s)(1), except for a bank organized under the laws of a territory of the United States.

“Foreign trust institution” means a trust institution, other than a foreign bank, chartered in a foreign country.

“Hazardous condition” with respect to a trust institution means:

A refusal by the trust institution to permit examination of its books, papers, accounts, records, or affairs by the Commissioner or a duly appointed or authorized examiner of the Commissioner, or a refusal by the officers or directors of a trust institution to be examined under oath regarding its affairs;

A material violation by a trust institution of a condition of its chartering or an agreement entered into between the trust institution and the Commissioner; or

A circumstance or condition in which an unreasonable risk of loss is threatened to clients, creditors, or shareholders of a trust institution because the trust institution:

Has equity capital that is, or is in substantial danger of becoming, inadequate for the safe and sound conduct of its business without regard to whether it is, or is in substantial danger of becoming, insolvent;

Has concentrated an excessive or unreasonable portion of its assets in a particular type or character of investment;

Violates or fails to comply with this Article, another statute or rule applicable to trust institutions, or any duly issued order of the Commissioner;

Is in a condition that renders the continuation of a particular business practice hazardous to its clients, creditors, or shareholders; or

Conducts business in an unsafe or unsound manner, which includes conducting business with:

Materially inexperienced or inattentive management;

Dangerous operating practices;

Materially infrequent or inadequate audits;

Materially deficient administration of assets in relation to the volume and character of the assets it administers or the trust institution’s responsibility for such assets;

Materially frequent or serious failures to adhere to sound administrative practices;

Materially frequent or serious violations of applicable laws, rules, or terms of instruments governing accounts; or

Materially serious self-dealing or conflicts of interest.

(24)

“Home country” means a foreign country in which a foreign trust institution is chartered.

(25)

“Home country regulator” means the bank supervisory agency with primary responsibility for chartering and supervising a foreign trust institution.

(26)

“Home state” means:

a.

With respect to a federally chartered savings association and a national bank, the state in which the institution maintains its principal office;

b.

With respect to a foreign bank, the home state of the foreign bank as determined in accordance with the International Banking Act of 1978, 12 U.S.C. §§ 3101, et seq., and Article 18A of this Chapter or, if there is no such home state, the state in which the foreign bank maintains its principal office in the United States; and

c.

With respect to any other trust institution, the state or home country which chartered the institution.

(27)

“Home state regulator” means the bank supervisory agency with primary responsibility for chartering and supervising an out-of-state trust institution.

(28)

“Host state” means a state other than the home state of a trust institution, or a foreign country, in which the trust institution maintains or seeks to establish or acquire and maintain a trust office or representative trust office.

(29)

“Initial capital” means the amount of equity capital required for approval of a charter pursuant to

G.S. 53-337

.

(30)

“Insolvent,” with respect to a State trust company, means a circumstance or condition in which a State trust company:

a.

Is unable or lacks the means to meet its current obligations as they come due in the regular and ordinary course of business, without regard to whether its assets exceed its liabilities;

b.

Has equity capital less than one-fourth of its initial capital, except as otherwise specified by the Commissioner; or

c.

Has purported to make a voluntary assignment of its assets for the benefit of creditors or to take any action for protection against creditors under any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

(31)

“Jeopardized” means insolvent, in a hazardous condition, or in such other condition as the Commissioner determines warrants the use of procedures set forth in this Article relating to jeopardized State trust companies.

(32)

“License”, with respect to a State trust company, means the authority granted by the Commissioner pursuant to

G.S. 53-160

.

(33)

“National bank” means a bank chartered under 12 U.S.C. § 21.

(34)

“Office” with respect to a trust institution means its principal office, a trust office, or a representative trust office, but not a branch. With respect to an out-of-state trust institution or a foreign trust institution without a physical office in this State, the term “office” also means the registered office.

(35)

“Out-of-state trust institution” means a trust institution that is neither a State trust institution nor a foreign trust institution.

(36)

“Person” means an individual or a company.

(37)

“Principal office” means:

a.

With respect to a State trust company, a location, registered with the Commissioner as the State trust company’s principal office, at which:

1.

The State trust company does business; and

2.

At least one executive officer of the State trust company maintains a customary place of work; and

b.

With respect to a trust institution other than a State trust company, its principal place of business.

(38)

“Principal shareholder” means a person who owns or has the ability or power to vote, directly, acting through one or more other persons, or otherwise indirectly, ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding shares of any class of voting securities of a company.

(39)

“Private trust company” means a State trust company that is organized to engage in business with one or more family members and does not transact business with the general public, as defined in

G.S. 53-363

.

(39a)

“Registered office” means a registered office as described in

G.S. 55D-30

.

(40)

“Representative trust office” means an office at which a trust institution engages in trust marketing, but not trust business.

(41)

“Savings association” has the meaning set forth in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(b)(1).

(42)

“State” means any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, and any territory of the United States.

(43)

“State bank” means:

a.

A bank organized under the provisions of this Chapter and authorized to act as a fiduciary by this State or

b.

A foreign bank lawfully doing business in this State pursuant to Article 18A of this Chapter.

(44)

“State savings association” means a savings association organized under the laws of this State and authorized to act as a fiduciary pursuant to Chapter 54B or Chapter 54C of the General Statutes.

(45)

“State trust company” means a company organized under the provisions of this Article and a trust company previously organized under other provisions of Chapter 53 of the General Statutes to operate only as a trust company and not as a commercial bank.

(46)

“State trust company facility” has the meaning set forth in

G.S. 53-340

.

(47)

“State trust institution” means a trust institution organized under the laws of, or having its principal office in, this State.

(48)

“Subsidiary” means a company that is controlled by another company, and includes a subsidiary of a subsidiary.

(49)

“Territory of the United States” means any geographic area over which the United States exercises sovereignty.

(49a)

“Transferring trust institution” means a trust institution that proposes to make, or does make, an affiliate transfer.

(49b)

“Transferee trust institution” means a trust institution to which an affiliate transfer is proposed to be made, or is made.

(50)

“Trust business” means acting as a fiduciary or in other capacities permissible for a trust institution under

G.S. 53-331

.

(51)

“Trust company” means a trust institution that is neither a depository institution nor a foreign bank.

(52)

“Trust institution” means any company lawfully acting as a fiduciary in a state or in a foreign country.

(53)

“Trust marketing” means the holding out by a company to the public by advertising, solicitation, or other means that the company is available to act as a fiduciary.

(54)

“Trust office” means an office, other than the principal office, through which a trust institution acts as a fiduciary, including, with respect to an out-of-state trust institution or a foreign trust institution without a physical office in this State, the registered office.

(55)

“Unauthorized trust activity” means:

a.

Engaging in trust business within this State by a company other than one identified in

G.S. 53-303

; or

b.

Maintenance of a representative trust office by an out-of-state trust institution without approval from or in violation of an order issued by the Commissioner.

These definitions shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes of this Article. The Commission may adopt other definitions to accomplish the purposes of this Article.

References to statutory laws of North Carolina and of the United States of America shall be deemed to refer to recodified, amended, predecessor, or successor statutes. References to agencies of North Carolina and of the United States of America shall be deemed to refer to predecessor or successor agencies.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, ss. 1, 2, 3; 2005-274, s. 1; 2011-339, s. 8; 2012-56, s. 29.

§ 53-302.
Title and purposes.

This Part may be cited as the Multistate Trust Institutions Act.

It is the express intent of this Part to permit trust institutions to engage in trust business on a multistate and international basis subject to the provisions of this Part.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

Subpart B. Companies Authorized to Engage in Trust Business.

§ 53-303.
Companies authorized to engage in trust business.

No company shall engage in trust business in this State except:

A State trust company;

A State bank;

A State savings association;

A national bank having its principal office in this State;

A federally chartered savings association having its principal office in this State;

An out-of-state trust institution in accordance with and subject to the provisions of Subpart D of this Part;

A foreign trust institution in accordance with and subject to the provisions of Subpart E of this Part; or

A company otherwise authorized to engage in trust business or to act in a particular capacity described in G.S. 53-331(b)(2) under the laws of this State or of the United States.

No company shall engage in unauthorized trust activity, and all companies shall engage in trust business in accordance with and subject to all applicable laws of this State.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-304.
Activities not requiring a charter, license, or approval.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, a company does not act as a fiduciary; engage in trust business or in any other business requiring a charter, license, or approval under the provisions of this Chapter; or engage in unauthorized trust activity by:

Acting in a manner authorized by law as an agent of a trust institution with respect to any activity that is not unauthorized trust activity;

Rendering legal services in a manner authorized by the North Carolina State Bar;

Acting as trustee under a deed of trust delivered only as security for the payment of money or for the performance of another act;

Receiving and distributing rents and proceeds of sales of real property in a manner authorized by the North Carolina Real Estate Commission;

Engaging in securities transactions or providing investment advisory services in accordance with applicable securities laws;

Engaging in the issuance, sale, or administration of an insurance or annuity product in a manner authorized by the North Carolina Department of Insurance;

Engaging in the lawful sale of prepaid funeral benefits in accordance with and subject to Article 13D of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes or engaging in the lawful business of a perpetual care cemetery corporation in accordance with and subject to Chapter 65 of the General Statutes;

Acting as trustee under a voting trust;

Acting as fiduciary by an organization described in paragraphs (1) through (5) of section 170(c) or section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, with respect to endowment funds or other funds owned, controlled, provided to, or otherwise made available to the organization with respect to its exempt purposes (including, without limitation, trust funds in which the organization has a beneficial interest).

Engaging in other activities expressly excluded from the application of this Article by rule, order, or declaratory ruling of the Commissioner;

Rendering services as a certified public accountant in a manner authorized by the North Carolina State Board of Certified Public Accountant Examiners;

Provided the company is a trust institution and is not barred by order of the Commissioner from engaging in trust marketing in this State pursuant to G.S. 53-321(b), (i) marketing or soliciting in this State with respect to acting as a fiduciary outside this State; (ii) delivering money or other intangible assets to, and receiving money or other intangible assets for administration outside this State from, a person in this State; or (iii) accepting an account outside this State or otherwise engaging in trust business outside this State; or

Receiving, holding, administering, or distributing real or personal property for or on behalf of another person solely incidental to a lawfully conducted activity or transaction.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-305.
Trust business of State trust institution.

A State trust institution may conduct any activities outside this State that are permissible for a trust institution in the host state, subject to the laws of this State and, in the case of a State bank or a State trust company, subject to rules, orders, or declaratory rulings of the Commissioner.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-306.
Trust business of out-of-state trust institution.

An out-of-state trust institution that establishes or acquires and maintains one or more trust offices or representative trust offices in this State under the provisions of this Part or that maintains one or more branches in this State may, subject to the provisions of this Part, conduct any activity through such a trust office, representative trust office, or branch that a State trust company or a State bank is authorized to conduct through a trust office, representative trust office, or branch under the laws of this State.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 4, effective August 12, 2005, substituted “through” for “at” following “conduct any activity” and “authorized to conduct.”

§ 53-307.
Trust business of foreign trust institution.

A foreign trust institution that establishes or acquires and maintains one or more trust offices in this State under the provisions of this Part may, subject to the provisions of this Part, also establish or acquire one or more representative trust offices and conduct any activity through the trust offices or representative trust offices that a State trust company is authorized to conduct through trust offices or representative trust offices under the laws of this State.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 5, effective August 12, 2005, substituted “through” for “at” following “conduct any activity” and “authorized to conduct.”

§ 53-308.
Name of trust institution.

Subject to other provisions of applicable law, a person may register or reserve any name with the Secretary of State in connection with engaging or proposing to engage in trust business or trust marketing in this State, except that the Commissioner may determine that a name registered or reserved is potentially misleading to the public and require the use of a name that is not potentially misleading.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-309.
Trust deposits of authorized trust institutions.

Subsection (b) of

G.S. 36A-63

shall not apply to an authorized trust institution.

In the absence of a contrary provision in an instrument governing an account, an authorized trust institution may deposit client funds with itself to satisfy its duties under G.S. 36A-63(a) provided:

It maintains, as collateral for the deposits, a separate fund of readily marketable commercial bonds having not less than a recognized “A” rating equal to one hundred and twenty-five percent (125%) of the funds so deposited;

The separate fund is designated as such; and

The separate fund either is maintained under the control of another trust institution, a bank, or a government agency, or is held by the authorized trust institution for the benefit of the accounts with deposits secured by the separate fund; provided, that the Commissioner may require such a separate fund of an authorized trust institution that is insolvent, in a hazardous condition, or jeopardized, to be held by a separate trust institution or bank approved by the Commissioner.

An authorized trust institution may make periodic withdrawals from or additions to the separate fund required by subsection (b) of this section as long as the required value is maintained. Income from the separate fund belongs to the authorized trust institution.

Collateral is not required for a deposit under subsection (b) of this section to the extent the deposit is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

Subpart C. State Trust Company Trust Offices and Representative Trust Offices.

§ 53-310.
Offices of State trust companies.

A State trust company may engage in trust business or trust marketing through its principal office and through each trust office as permitted by this Part.

A State trust company may engage in trust marketing through a representative trust office as permitted by this Part.

A State trust company may engage in trust business and trust marketing through out-of-state trust offices or representative trust offices to the same extent permitted for trust institutions located in the host state through which those out-of-state trust offices or representative trust offices are located, subject to the laws of this State and as provided by rules, orders, or declaratory rulings of the Commissioner.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 6, effective August 12, 2005, substituted “through” for “at” throughout subsections (a) and (b); substituted “through” for “in” twice in subsection (c).

§ 53-311.
State trust company principal office.

Each State trust company is required to maintain a principal office in this State and to register that principal office with the Commissioner by setting forth the current street address and telephone number of the principal office.

Each executive officer at a principal office is an agent of the State trust company for service of process.

Before changing the location of its principal office, a State trust company shall file a notice with the Commissioner setting forth the name of the State trust company, the current street address and telephone number of its principal office, the street address, and telephone number if known, of the proposed new principal office, and a copy of the resolution adopted by the board of directors or duly authorized committee of the board of directors of the State trust company authorizing the change. If the State trust company is unable to provide the Commissioner with the telephone number for the proposed new principal office at the time of the notice, it shall do so immediately after beginning to operate at the new principal office location.

The change of principal office shall take effect on the thirty-first day following the date the Commissioner receives the notice described in subsection (c) of this section, unless prior to the thirty-first day following receipt of the notice, the Commissioner (i) establishes an earlier or later date, or (ii) notifies the State trust company that the notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis, or (iii) disapproves the proposed trust office or representative trust office.

If the Commissioner gives a notification described in subsection (d) of this section, the State trust company may change the location of its principal office only on approval by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may disapprove the change of location if the Commissioner finds that the change will adversely affect the safe and sound operation of the State trust company.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-312.
Trust offices; representative trust offices.

Before establishing or acquiring and maintaining a trust office or representative trust office in this State, a State trust company shall file a notice with the Commissioner, in the form required by the Commissioner, setting forth the name of the State trust company, the location of the proposed trust office or representative trust office, and whether the office will be a trust office or a representative trust office. The State trust company also shall furnish a copy of the resolution adopted by the board of directors or duly authorized committee of the board of directors of the State trust company authorizing the trust office or representative trust office and shall pay the filing fee, if any, set by rule.

The State trust company may commence business at the trust office or representative trust office on the thirty-first day after the date the Commissioner receives the notice, unless the Commissioner (i) establishes an earlier or later date; (ii) notifies the State trust company that the notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis; or (iii) disapproves the proposed trust office or representative trust office.

If the Commissioner gives a notification described in subsection (b) of this section, the State trust company may establish the trust office or representative trust office only on approval by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may disapprove the proposed trust office or representative trust office if the Commissioner finds that the State trust company lacks sufficient resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-313.
Out-of-state trust offices and representative trust offices.

Before establishing or acquiring and maintaining a trust office or representative trust office in a host state, a State trust company shall file a notice with the Commissioner, in the form required by the Commissioner, that sets forth the name of the State trust company, the location of the proposed trust office or representative trust office, whether the office will be a trust office or a representative trust office, and whether the laws of the host state permit the trust office or representative trust office to be maintained by the State trust company. The State trust company also shall furnish a copy of the resolution adopted by the board of directors or duly authorized committee of the board of directors of the State trust company authorizing the out-of-state trust office or representative trust office and shall pay the filing fee, if any, set by rule.

The State trust company may commence business at the trust office or representative trust office on the thirty-first day following the date the Commissioner receives the notice, unless the Commissioner (i) establishes an earlier or later date; (ii) notifies the State trust company that the notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis; or (iii) disapproves the proposed trust office or representative trust office.

If the Commissioner gives a notification described in subsection (b) of this section, the State trust company may establish the trust office or representative trust office only on approval by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may disapprove the proposed trust office or representative trust office if the Commissioner finds that the State trust company lacks sufficient resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

Subpart D. Out-of-State Trust Institution Trust Offices and Representative Trust Offices.

§ 53-314.
Trust business through a branch or trust office.

An out-of-state trust institution may engage in trust business in this State only if it (i)
maintains a trust office in this State as permitted by this Subpart, (ii) was allowed to maintain a trust office in this State under laws, or rules or orders of the Commissioner in effect prior to the date of enactment of this Article, but only to the extent allowed and subject to all limitations and conditions imposed under those laws, rules, or orders, or (iii) is a depository institution that maintains a branch in this State.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 7, effective August 12, 2005, substituted “through” for “at” in the section catchline.

§ 53-315.
Establishing an interstate trust office.

An out-of-state trust institution that obtains approval from the Commissioner in accordance with the provisions of this Subpart may establish and maintain a trust office in this State; provided that the Commissioner shall not grant that approval unless the home state of the out-of-state trust institution permits a State trust institution to establish and maintain a trust office in that home state under restrictions not materially greater than those imposed by this Article.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-316.
Acquiring an interstate trust office.

An out-of-state trust institution that obtains approval from the Commissioner in accordance with the provisions of this Subpart may acquire and maintain a trust office in this State; provided that the Commissioner shall not grant that approval unless the home state of the out-of-state trust institution permits a State trust institution to acquire and maintain a trust office in that home state under restrictions not materially greater than those imposed by this Article.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-317.
Requirement of notice.

Before establishing or acquiring and maintaining a trust office in this State, an out-of-state trust institution shall provide, or cause its home state regulator to provide, notice to the Commissioner, in the form required by the Commissioner, along with copies of any applications, notices, or similar filings made with the home state regulator regarding the trust office. The notice shall be preceded or accompanied by:

Evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner of compliance by the out-of-state trust institution with all applicable requirements of Article 15 of Chapter 55 of the General Statutes;

Evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner of compliance by the out-of-state trust institution with any applicable requirements of its home state regulator for maintenance of capital, for expansion within the borders of the home state, and for acquiring or establishing and maintaining each trust office in this State;

Evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner that the out-of-state trust institution is not in a hazardous condition;

Unless waived by the Commissioner, a copy of the resolution adopted by the board of directors of the out-of-state trust institution (or similar governing body or a duly-authorized committee thereof) authorizing the trust office; and

Payment of any fee set by rule.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 8, effective August 12, 2005, substituted “all” for “any” in subdivision (1); and added “Unless waived by the Commissioner” in subdivision (4).

§ 53-318.
Action on notice.

The out-of-state trust institution may commence business in this State through the trust office on the sixty-first day following the date the Commissioner receives the notice described in

G.S. 53-317

unless the Commissioner, within 60 days of receiving the notice:

Specifies an earlier or later date for commencing business,

Extends the period of review on a determination that the notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis; or

Disapproves the proposed trust office.

If the Commissioner gives a notification described in subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section, the out-of-state trust institution may establish the trust office only on approval by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may disapprove the proposed trust office if the Commissioner finds that the out-of-state trust institution lacks sufficient resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness or that the requirements of

G.S. 53-315

or

G.S. 53-316

have not been satisfied.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 9, effective August 12, 2005, substituted “through” for “at” in subsection (a).

§ 53-319.
Additional trust offices; representative trust offices.

An out-of-state trust institution that maintains a trust office in this State may establish or acquire and maintain additional trust offices or one or more representative trust offices in this State to the same extent that a State trust institution may establish or acquire and maintain trust offices or representative trust offices in this State and shall follow the procedures for establishing or acquiring and maintaining trust offices or representative trust offices set forth in

G.S. 53-312

.

An out-of-state trust institution that does not maintain a trust office in this State shall file a notice with the Commissioner, in the form required by the Commissioner, before establishing or acquiring a representative trust office in this State. The notice shall be preceded or accompanied by:

Evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner of compliance by the out-of-state trust institution with all applicable requirements of Article 15 of Chapter 55 of the General Statutes;

Evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner of compliance by the out-of-state trust institution with any applicable requirements of its home state regulator for maintenance of capital, for expansion within the borders of the home state, and for acquiring or establishing and maintaining each representative trust office in this State;

Evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner that the out-of-state trust institution is not in a hazardous condition;

Unless waived by the Commissioner, a copy of the resolution adopted by the board of directors of the out-of-state trust institution (or similar governing body or a duly authorized committee thereof) authorizing the representative trust office;

The proposed location of each proposed representative trust office; and

Payment of any fee set by rule.

The out-of-state trust institution may commence business at the representative trust office on the thirty-first day following the date the Commissioner receives the notice described in subsection (b) of this section, unless the Commissioner, within 30 days of receiving the notice:

Specifies an earlier or later date for commencing business;

Extends the period of review on a determination that the notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis; or

Disapproves the proposed representative trust office.

If the Commissioner gives a notification described in subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section, the out-of-state trust institution may commence business at the representative trust office only on approval by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may disapprove the representative trust office if the Commissioner finds that the out-of-state trust institution lacks sufficient resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness or that the requirements of

G.S. 53-315

or

G.S. 53-316

have not been satisfied.

An out-of-state trust institution that was allowed to maintain a representative trust office in this State under laws, or rules or orders of the Commissioner in effect prior to the effective date of this Article may continue to do so, but only to the extent allowed and subject to all limitations and conditions imposed under those laws, rules, or orders.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 10, effective August 12, 2005, substituted “all” for “any” in subdivision (b)(10); and added “Unless waived by the Commissioner” in subdivision (b)(4).